Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 10.1-2117.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Biological nutrient removal technology”
means technology that will typically achieve at least an 8 mg/L total nitrogen concentration or at least a 1 mg/L total phosphorus concentration in effluent discharges.

“Chesapeake Bay Agreement”
means the Chesapeake Bay Agreement of 2000 and any amendments thereto.

“Eligible nonsignificant discharger”
means any publicly owned treatment works that is not a significant discharger but due to expansion or new construction is subject to a technology-based standard under § 62.1-44.19:15 or 62.1-44.19:16.

“Fund”
means the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund established by Article 4 (§

10.1-2128

et seq.).

“Individual”
means any corporation, foundation, association or partnership or one or more natural persons.

“Institutions of higher education”
means any educational institution meeting the requirements of §

60.2-220

.

“Local government”
means any county, city, town, municipal corporation, authority, district, commission or political subdivision of the Commonwealth.

“Nonpoint source pollution”
means pollution of state waters washed from the land surface in a diffuse manner and not resulting from a discernible, defined or discrete conveyance.

“Nutrient removal technology”
means state-of-the-art nutrient removal technology, biological nutrient removal technology, or other nutrient removal technology.

“Point source pollution”
means pollution of state waters resulting from any discernible, defined or discrete conveyances.

“Publicly owned treatment works”
means a publicly owned sewage collection system consisting of pipelines or conduits, pumping stations and force mains, and all other construction, devices, and appliances appurtenant thereto, or any equipment, plant, treatment works, structure, machinery, apparatus, interest in land, or any combination of these, not including an onsite sewage system, that is used, operated, acquired, or constructed for the storage, collection, treatment, neutralization, stabilization, reduction, recycling, reclamation, separation, or disposal of wastewater, or for the final disposal of residues resulting from the treatment of sewage, including but not limited to: treatment or disposal plants; outfall sewers, interceptor sewers, and collector sewers; pumping and ventilating stations, facilities, and works; and other real or personal property and appurtenances incident to their development, use, or operation.

“Reasonable sewer costs”
means the amount expended per household for sewer service in relation to the median household income of the service area as determined by guidelines developed and approved by the State Water Control Board for use with the Virginia Water Facilities Revolving Fund established pursuant to Chapter 22 (§ 62.1-224 et seq.) of Title 62.1.

“Significant discharger”
means (i) a publicly owned treatment works discharging to the Chesapeake Bay watershed with a design capacity of 0.5 million gallons per day or greater, (ii) a publicly owned treatment works discharging to the Chesapeake Bay watershed east of the fall line with a design capacity of 0.1 million gallons per day or greater, (iii) a planned or newly expanding publicly owned treatment works discharging to the Chesapeake Bay watershed, which is expected to be in operation by 2010 with a permitted design of 0.5 million gallons per day or greater, or (iv) a planned or newly expanding publicly owned treatment works discharging to the Chesapeake Bay watershed east of the fall line with a design capacity of 0.1 million gallons per day or greater, which is expected to be in operation by 2010.

“State-of-the-art nutrient removal technology”
means technology that will achieve at least a 3 mg/L total nitrogen concentration or at least a 0.3 mg/L total phosphorus concentration in effluent discharges.

“State waters”
means all waters on the surface or under the ground, wholly or partially within or bordering the Commonwealth or within its jurisdictions.

“Water Quality Improvement Grants”
means grants available from the Fund for projects of local governments, institutions of higher education, and individuals (i) to achieve nutrient reduction goals in regulations, permits, or the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan or (ii) to achieve other water quality restoration, protection or enhancement benefits.

History.

1997, cc. 21, 625, 626; 1999, c. 257; 2005, cc. 704, 707, 709; 2006, c. 236; 2007, c. 924; 2015, c. 164.

Cross references.

As to wastewater infrastructure policy, see § 62.1-223.1 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 924, which amended the definition of “Publicly owned treatment works,” in cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2009, except the provisions of § 54.1-2301, which shall become effective in due course.”

The 1999 amendment,

effective March 18, 1999, inserted the paragraph defining “Institutions of higher education,” and inserted “institutions of higher education” in the paragraph “Water Quality Improvement Grants.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 704, 707, and 709 are identical, and inserted the definitions for “Chesapeake Bay Agreement,” “Publicly owned treatment works,” “Significant discharger,” “State-of-the-art nutrient removal technology,” and “Tributary strategy plans”; and in the definition of “Water Quality Improvement Grants,” inserted “strategy” preceding “plans,” and deleted “developed pursuant to §§ 2.2-218 through 2.2-220” at the end of clause (i).

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 236 inserted the definitions of “Biological nutrient removal technology,” “Eligible nonsignificant discharger” and “Nutrient removal technology” and inserted “or applicable regulatory requirements” in the definition of “Water Quality Improvement Grants.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 924, effective July 1, 2009, deleted “disposal” following “not including onsite sewage” in the definition of “Publicly owned treatment works.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 164 deleted “of this chapter” at the end of the definition of “Fund”; deleted the definition of “Tributary strategy plan”; and substituted “regulations, permits, or the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan” for “tributary strategy plans or applicable regulatory requirements” in the definition of “Water Quality Improvement Grants.”

Law Review.

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

20 M.J. Waters and Watercourses, §§ 3, 19.

§ 10.1-2118.
Cooperative program established.

It shall be the policy of the Commonwealth, and it is the purpose of this chapter, to restore and improve the quality of state waters and to protect them from impairment and destruction for the benefit of current and future citizens of the Commonwealth. The General Assembly further determines and finds that the quality of state waters is subject to potential pollution and degradation, including excess nutrients, from both point and nonpoint source pollution and that the purposes of the State Water Control Law (§ 62.1-44.2 et seq.) and all other laws related to the restoration, protection and improvement of the quality of state waters will be enhanced by the implementation of the provisions of this chapter. The General Assembly further determines and finds that the restoration, protection and improvement of the quality of state waters is a shared responsibility among state and local governments and individuals and to that end this chapter establishes cooperative programs related to nutrient reduction and other point and nonpoint sources of pollution.

History.

1997, cc. 21, 625, 626.

§ 10.1-2119.
Effect of chapter on other governmental authority.

The authorities and powers granted by the provisions of this chapter are supplemental to other state and local governmental authority and do not limit in any way other water quality restoration, protection and enhancement authority of any agency or local government of the Commonwealth. All counties, cities and towns are authorized to exercise their police and zoning powers to protect the quality of state waters from nonpoint source pollution as provided in this Code.

History.

1997, cc. 21, 625, 626.